Hawaii statutes.
[§88F-10] Deferred amounts as compensation.
Any compensation deferred pursuant to a plan established under this chapter
shall be deemed regular compensation, but shall not be included in the
computation of federal income taxes withheld on behalf of any participating
employee. [L 1996, c 212, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next